Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
CONTRIBUTIONS AND SERVICE CREDIT

31-31.5-301. Defined benefit component minimum contributions.

Every member covered under the defined benefit component of the statewide retirement plan shall pay into the lifetime benefits account twelve percent of base salary paid or any higher member contribution rate established pursuant to part 6 of this article 31.5. The payment shall be made by the employer by deduction from the salary paid to the member.

Every employer employing members who are covered by the defined benefit component of the statewide retirement plan shall pay into the lifetime benefits account nine percent of the base salary paid to the member or any higher employer contribution rate established pursuant to part 6 of this article 31.5. The employer contribution rate shall increase by three percent to be implemented through six annual increases as follows: Beginning in 2023, and each year thereafter through 2028, the employer contribution rate shall increase by an additional one-half of one percent of base salary until the total employer contribution rate, including the cumulative contribution rate increases, is twelve percent of base salary.

In addition to the rate established in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the employer contribution rate shall be increased by one percent of base salary to be implemented as follows: Beginning in 2029, and continuing through 2030, the employer contribution rate shall increase by an additional one-half of one percent of base salary in each year for a total of a one percent increase in order to pay for the cost of providing the option to retire contained in section 31-31.5-401 (2)(b).

After considering the results of the actuarial valuation conducted pursuant to section 31-31.5-402, if the assets of the lifetime benefit components of the plan combined with projected contributions are sufficient to fully fund the benefits provided for in part 4 of this article 31.5 on an actuarially sound basis plus the projected cost of living adjustments as determined by the board, the board may, in its sole discretion, allocate surplus contributions to the money purchase component pursuant to section 31-31.5-304. The board shall designate whether any such allocation is an employer contribution or a member contribution.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 285, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-302. Social security component minimum contributions.

This component covers the members of those employers that have elected coverage under the plan pursuant to section 31-31-704.5.

Each member shall make contributions at one-half of the member contribution rate established for the defined benefit component in section 31-31.5-301 by deduction from the salary paid to the member. For each member, the employer shall pay one-half of the employer contribution rate established for the defined benefit component in section 31-31.5-301 including any allocation made to the money purchase component made pursuant to section 31-31.5-301 (3).

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 285, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-303. Hybrid component minimum contributions.

Every employer shall contribute to the lifetime benefits account eight percent of the base salary of the member. The employer contribution rate shall increase by one percent of base salary to be implemented through eight annual increases as follows: Beginning in 2023, and each year thereafter through 2030, the employer contribution rate shall increase by an additional one-eighth of one percent of base salary until the total employer contribution rate, including the cumulative contribution rate increases, is nine percent of base salary.

Every member shall contribute to the lifetime benefits account eight percent of the base salary of the member. The member contribution rate shall increase by one percent of base salary to be implemented through eight annual increases as follows: Beginning in 2023, and each year thereafter through 2030, the member contribution rate shall increase by an additional one-eighth of one percent of base salary until the total member contribution rate, including the cumulative contribution rate increases, is nine percent of base salary. The payment shall be made by the employer by deduction from the salary paid to the member.

The combined mandatory contributions shall be allocated between the hybrid component and the money purchase component as determined annually by the board based on the amount required to fund the benefit provided under the hybrid component.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 286, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-304. Money purchase component contributions.

For members who elected the money purchase only option upon reentry into a predecessor plan, the contribution rate for employers and members is equal to the contribution rates established in the predecessor plan.

Contributions, including separate retirement account balances from the predecessor statewide defined benefit plan established under part 4 of article 31 of this title 31, transfers from the predecessor statewide hybrid plan money purchase accounts, surplus contributions allocated from the defined benefit component contributions pursuant to section 31-31.5-301 (3), the portion of the minimum contributions of hybrid component allocated to the money purchase component pursuant to section 31-31.5-303 (3), increased local mandatory contributions pursuant to section 31-31.5-307, and increased local voluntary contributions pursuant to section 31-31.5-308 must be deposited in the money purchase component.

The board may provide through rules for rollovers or transfer of funds from other plans to be deposited in the money purchase component subject to requirements and limits established by the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 286, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-305. Continuing rates of contribution for reentry and affiliating departments.

At the time of reentry or affiliation, the board may establish a continuing rate of contribution for departments reentering or affiliating with the statewide retirement plan in addition to the employer and member contributions otherwise required by this part 3 in order to maintain the actuarial soundness of the plan and the plan for disability and survivors benefits provided for in part 8 of article 31 of this title 31.

It shall be locally decided during the affiliation process whether the continuing rate of contribution shall be made by the member or the employer or split equally between the member and the employer.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 287, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-306. Picked-up contributions.

Each employer shall pick up the mandatory employee contributions required under this part 3, to the extent allowed by the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and the contributions picked up shall be treated as employer contributions pursuant to section 414(h)(2) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, in determining their income tax treatment. The employer shall pay these employee contributions directly to the association, instead of paying such amounts to the members. Such contributions shall be paid from the same funds that are used in paying salaries to the members. Such contributions, although designated as employee contributions, shall be paid by the employer in lieu of contributions by the members. Members may not elect to choose to receive such contributions directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the plan. Employee contributions so picked up shall be treated for all purposes of this article 31.5, other than federal tax, in the same manner as employee contributions made before the date picked up.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 287, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-307. Increased local mandatory contribution requirements.

An employer or active member or both may be required to pay a mandatory contribution rate in excess of the rate established in section 31-31.5-301, 31-31.5-302, or 31-31.5-303 upon enactment by the employer of a resolution or ordinance setting forth the higher contribution rate and approval of the higher rate by at least sixty-five percent of the employer's active members voting for the higher contribution rate.

An employee who has previously established a mandatory contribution rate under a local money purchase plan in excess of the mandatory contribution rate may continue the previous contribution rate as an increased contribution rate.

Upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance, and approval of at least sixty-five percent of the employer's active members voting, a mandatory contribution rate in excess of the minimum required contribution rate may be reduced to the minimum required contribution rate or the excess above the minimum required contribution rate may be redirected to another available employee benefit.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 287, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-308. Increased local voluntary contribution requirements.

Active members may make additional after-tax contributions to the money purchase component account under part 5 of this article 31.5. Voluntary member contributions are not subject to the employer pick-up provisions of section 414(h)(2) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

Employers may make additional contributions to the money purchase component account under part 5 of this article 31.5 on behalf of members. Employer voluntary contributions vest on the schedule established in section 31-31.5-501.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 288, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-309. Remittance of contributions to the association.

Remittances of contributions are due no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to a member. All remittances of contributions must be credited to the defined benefit system trust fund.

The payments required by this section are subject to interest as established by the board if not submitted when due.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 288, § 1, effective August 10.

31-31.5-310. Service credit purchases.

Members participating in the lifetime benefit components may purchase, including by rollover or transfer of funds, additional defined benefit service credit for other public employment within the United States not covered by the plan, United States uniformed military service, or up to five years of private employment, subject to the limits established by the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and as may be allowed under the rules and regulations adopted by the board.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 288, § 1, effective August 10.